Tennessee, session 114, HB2446.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 68-102-154(d), is amended by
deleting the language:
The total amount of grants awarded each year must be equally divided among the three
(3) grand divisions of the state.
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 68-102-154(e)(1), is amended by
deleting the language:
, other than fire trucks or vehicles
SECTION 3. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it,
and applies to grants awarded after June 30, 2026.
HB2446
010163
- 1 -